Washington statutes.
RCW 11.04.081

Inheritance by and from any child not dependent upon marriage of parents.

For the purpose of inheritance to, through, and from any child, the effects and treatment of the parent-child relationship shall not depend upon whether or not the parents have been married.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 42 s 24; 1965 c 145 s 11.04.081. Formerly RCW 11.04.080 and 11.04.090.]

NOTES:

Effect of decree of adoption: RCW 26.33.260.

"Issue" includes all lawfully adopted children: RCW 11.02.005(11).